Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1301.03
Venue; jurisdiction in two or more counties; effect of conviction or acquittal.

Where an offense is within the jurisdiction of two or more counties, a conviction or acquittal thereof in one county is a bar to a prosecution or indictment therefor in another.

Laws 1957, c. 103, § 4, p. 364.